Utah statutes.
31A-22-614.7.   Uniform claims processing -- Electronic exchange of prescription drug pre-authorization.

(1)  The commissioner shall consult with national and state organizations involved with the standardized exchange of health data, and the electronic exchange of health data, to study and review:

(a)  the process of prior authorization of prescription drugs; and

(b)  the standards for the use and electronic exchange of a uniform prescription drug prior authorization form that meet federal mandatory minimum standards and follow the adoption of national requirements for transaction and data elements in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act.

(2)  The commissioner and the organization described in Subsection (1) shall report their progress and findings to the Legislature's Business and Labor Interim Committee before October 1, 2013 and before November 1, 2014.



Enacted by Chapter 361, 2013 General Session

